Hawaii statutes.
§342H-32 Plans and reports. The
director may require complete and detailed plans or reports on existing solid
waste management systems and of any proposed addition to, modification of, or
alteration of any such systems that contain the information requested by the
director in the form prescribed by the director. The plans or reports shall be
made by a competent person acceptable to the director and at the expense of
such applicant or owner. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §4; am L 1998, c 226, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next